Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.575

Student housing—Liquor prohibited, areas—Complaints regarding liquor and illegal drug use—Policies, procedures, sanctions.

(1) Each public institution of higher education shall notify all students applying for college or university-owned student housing of the availability of housing in an area in which all liquor use is prohibited.

(2) Each public institution of higher education, upon request, shall provide students access to student housing on a residence hall floor, designated area, or in a building where liquor use is prohibited.

(3) Each public institution shall have in place, and distribute to students in college or university-owned student housing, a process for reporting violations and complaints of liquor and illegal drug use.

(4) Each public institution shall have in place, distribute to students, and vigorously enforce policies and procedures for investigating complaints regarding liquor and illegal drug use in college or university-owned student housing, including the sanctions that may be applied for violations of the institution's liquor and illegal drug use policies.

(5) Students who violate the institution's liquor and illegal drug use policies are subject to disciplinary action. Sanctions that may be applied for violations of the institution's liquor or illegal drug use policies include warnings, restitution for property damage, probation, expulsion from college or university-owned housing, and suspension from the institution.

(6) As used in this section:

(a) "Liquor" has the meaning in RCW 66.04.010; and

(b) "Illegal drug use" refers to the unlawful use of controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW or legend drugs under chapter 69.41 RCW.

[ 1996 c 17 s 2.]

NOTES:

Policy—1996 c 17: "The state makes a substantial investment of finances and resources in students who are attending state institutions of higher education. In exchange, students are expected to actively pursue their education and contribute to an academic environment that is conducive to learning. Students who abuse liquor and drugs, however, are unable to make full use of this educational opportunity. More important, students who abuse liquor and drugs create an environment that interferes with the ability of other students to pursue their education. This is especially true in university-owned student housing where liquor and drug abuse contribute to noise, vandalism, theft, and violence. While the universities and colleges may not be able to stop all liquor and drug abuse among student populations, the very least they can do is ensure that the vast majority of students without drug or liquor problems are provided with a living environment that is safe and conducive to the pursuit of higher education." [ 1996 c 17 s 1.]